Utah statutes.
31A-8-215.   Management.

Chapter 5, Part 4, Management of Insurance Corporations, applies to organizations, except that for purposes of this chapter, Subsections 31A-5-412(3)(a)(vi) through (ix) shall be read: "corporate reorganizations under Section 31A-8-216."

